Virginia statutes. Title 12.1. State Corporation Commission.
Chapter 1. General Provisions.

§ 12.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term “corporation” or “company” shall mean all corporations created by acts of the General Assembly of Virginia, or under the general incorporation laws of this Commonwealth, or doing business therein, and shall exclude all municipal corporations, other political subdivisions, and public institutions owned or controlled by the Commonwealth; and the term “the Commission” shall mean the State Corporation Commission.

History.

Code 1950, §

12-1

; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.

Cross references.

As to constitutional provisions relating to the State Corporation Commission, see Va. Const., Art. IX.

Editor’s note.

At its regular session of 1970, the General Assembly directed the Code Commission to undertake a general revision of the Code, with particular reference to amendments throughout the Code that would be necessary under the proposed revision of the Constitution of Virginia, subsequently adopted by the voters at the election held on November 3, 1970. In November of 1970 the Commission sent to the Governor and General Assembly its report, containing a proposed revision of Title 12, relating to the State Corporation Commission. This report, which was published as House Document No. 2 of the 1971 extra session, contains much valuable explanatory matter, which is, however, too lengthy for inclusion here. The Commission’s draft of the revision of Title 12, as amended by the General Assembly, became Chapter 157 of the Acts of 1971, Extra Session. It repealed Title 12 of the Code, and enacted in lieu thereof a new Title 12.1.

Some of the cases cited in the notes under the various sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of former law.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia municipal corporations and administrative law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1572 (1971).

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1632 (1975).

For special section on ratemaking and public policy in Virginia, see 18 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 73 (1976).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3B M.J. Carriers, §§ 2, 4; 15 M.J. Railroads, § 11.

§ 12.1-2.
State Corporation Commission.

There shall be a permanent commission known as the State Corporation Commission which shall have the powers and duties prescribed by law and by Article IX of the Constitution of Virginia.

History.

1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.

§ 12.1-3.
Seal of the Commission.

The Commission shall have and use a common seal, to consist of a circular die with the coat-of-arms of Virginia and the title “State Corporation Commission” stamped upon the face of the die, and shall have power to affix such seal to any paper, record, or document when necessary for the purpose of authentication, and such seal, when so affixed to any paper, record, or document emanating from the Commission or its clerk’s office, shall have the same force and effect for authentication as the seal of any court of record in this Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-3; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.

§ 12.1-4.
Annual report of the Commission.

Each year, the Commission shall make an annual report to the Governor as of December 31 of the preceding year. Copies of this report may be sold by the Clerk of the Commission at a price sufficient to cover costs of printing and binding. The Commission may from time to time include in such annual reports recommendations for new or additional legislation pertaining to matters within its jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-4; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157; 1985, c. 34.

§ 12.1-5.
Offices; notice, writ or process; where public sessions may be held.

The offices of the Commission shall be located, and its public sessions held, in the City of Richmond, and all notices, writs and processes issued by the Commission shall be made returnable to, and command the corporation or person against whom directed to appear before the Commission and answer on a certain day to be named therein; but the Commission may, in its discretion, if public necessity or the convenience of the parties require, hold public sessions elsewhere in the Commonwealth, and may order any notice, writ, or process to be made returnable to the place of any such session; and for the holding of any such session the Commission may occupy the courtroom of the courthouse of the city or county wherein such session may be held, if such courtroom shall not at the time be in use for the sessions of the court of any such city or county.

History.

Code 1950, § 12-5; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 157.